Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Regulation of Junk Yards.

Sec. 08.60.010.
License required; violation of section a misdemeanor. [Repealed, § 3 ch 67 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 08.60.020.
[Renumbered as AS 08.60.010.]

Sec. 08.60.030.
Residence defined. [Repealed, § 26 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 08.60.050.
General prohibition.

A person may not establish, operate, or maintain a commercial or public junk yard without a certificate of location prescribed by AS

08.60.050

—

08.60.100

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 1962)

Sec. 08.60.060.
Certificate of location.

A person using or proposing to use a location for a commercial or public junk yard shall obtain a certificate of approval for the location.
If the location is in a city of any class, the certificate shall be procured from the city council or its designee.
If the location is outside the city limits but within the boundaries of an organized borough, the certificate shall be procured from the assembly of the organized borough or its designee.
If the location is outside an incorporated city or borough, the certificate of location shall be obtained from the commissioner of public safety.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1965)

Sec. 08.60.070.
Standards for location and regulation.

The commissioner of public safety, the city council, and organized borough assembly, in considering applications and regulations, shall take into account

the nature and development of surrounding property;

the need to protect the local economy, adjacent land owners, and the motoring public from economically depressing and unsightly roadside locations;

the proximity of churches, schools, hospitals, public buildings, recreation areas, or other places of public gathering;

the sufficiency in number of other similar business establishments in the vicinity;

the adequacy of fences and other types of enclosures to prevent the unsightly display of a junk yard;

the health, safety, and general welfare of the public;

the suitability of the applicant to establish, maintain, or operate the business under AS

08.60.050

—

08.60.100

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 26 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 1965)

Sec. 08.60.080.
Authorization to impose conditions for establishment, operation, and maintenance.

The commissioner of public safety or the cities or organized boroughs shall examine the location or proposed location of a junk yard and adopt reasonable regulations concerning the establishment, operation, and maintenance of businesses under the standards set out in AS

08.60.070

.
The regulations may require the erection, location, and size of fences or other structures surrounding the junk yard. Regulations pertaining to junk yards are subject to the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 4 ch 26 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 10 SLA 1965; am § 3 ch 143 SLA 1968)

Sec. 08.60.090.
Penalty.

A person who operates, establishes, or maintains a junk yard in any location without procuring a certificate of approval is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for a term of not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 5 ch 26 SLA 1962)

Sec. 08.60.100.
Definitions.

In AS

08.60.050

—

08.60.100

,

“junk” means any secondhand and used machinery, scrap iron, copper, lead, zinc, aluminum, or other metals; it also includes wrecked automobiles, tools, implements, rags, used building materials, rubber, and paper;

“junk yard” means a location where junk is gathered together and stored for a commercial or public purpose;

“person” means an individual and, where consistent with collective capacity, a committee, firm, partnership, company, corporation, club, governmental agency, organization, association, or other combination of individuals.

History.

(§ 6 ch 26 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms.